Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission.

Sec. 44.37.065.
Commission established; membership.

The Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission is established in the Department of Natural Resources. The Department of Natural Resources shall provide staff support to the commission.

The commission is composed of 11 members appointed by the governor for terms of three years. A vacancy is filled for the unexpired term.

The governor shall appoint to the commission

a representative from the University of Alaska;

three representatives, each from a local government in a separate seismically active region of the state;

a representative from the Department of Natural Resources;

a representative from the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

a representative from an appropriate federal agency;

a representative of the insurance industry; and

three members from members of the public who are expert in the fields of geology, seismology, hydrology, geotechnical engineering, structural engineering, emergency services, or planning.

The commission shall elect annually from its members a chair and vice-chair. A majority of the commission may vote to replace an officer of the commission.

Six members constitute a quorum.

Members of the Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(E.O. No. 105, § 2 (2003); am §§ 1, 2 ch 71 SLA 2006)

Sec. 44.37.067.
Powers and duties.

The commission shall

recommend goals and priorities for seismic hazard mitigation to the public and private sectors;

recommend policies to the governor and the legislature, including needed research, mapping, and monitoring programs;

offer advice on coordinating disaster preparedness and seismic hazard mitigation activities of government at all levels, review the practices for recovery and reconstruction after a major earthquake, and recommend improvements to mitigate losses from similar future events;

gather, analyze, and disseminate information of general interest on seismic hazard mitigation;

establish and maintain necessary working relationships with other public and private agencies;

review predictions and warnings issued by the federal government, research institutions, and other organizations and persons and suggest appropriate responses at the state and local levels; and

review proposed seismic hazard notifications and supporting information from state agencies, evaluate possible socioeconomic consequences, recommend that the governor issue formal seismic hazard notifications when appropriate, and advise state and local agencies of appropriate responses.

The commission may

advise the governor and the legislature on disaster preparedness and seismic hazard mitigation and on budgets for those activities and may recommend legislation or policies to improve disaster preparedness or seismic hazard mitigation;

conduct public hearings;

appoint committees from its membership and appoint external advisory committees of ex-officio members; and

accept grants, contributions, and appropriations from public agencies, private foundations, and individuals.

History.

(E.O. No. 105, § 2 (2003))

Sec. 44.37.069.
Definitions.

In AS

44.37.065

—

44.37.069

,

“commission” means the Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission;

“disaster preparedness” means establishing plans and programs for responding to and distributing funds to alleviate losses from a disaster as defined in AS

26.23.900

;

“seismic hazard” means an earthquake-induced geologic condition that is a potential danger to life and property; in this paragraph, “geologic condition” includes strong ground shaking, landslide, avalanche, liquefaction, tsunami inundation, fault displacement, and subsidence;

“seismic hazard mitigation” or “mitigation” mean activities that prevent or alleviate the harmful effects of seismic hazards to persons and property, including identification and evaluation of the seismic hazards, assessment of the risks, and implementation of measures to reduce potential losses before a damaging event occurs;

“tsunami” means a large ocean wave produced by an earthquake, landslide, or volcanic eruption.

History.

(E.O. No. 105, § 2 (2003); am § 3 ch 71 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, paragraph (3) was enacted as paragraph (4); renumbered in 2006, at which time former paragraph (3) was renumbered as paragraph (4).

Secs. 44.37.100 — 44.37.180.
Northwestern Alaska Development Commission. [Repealed, § 99 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 44.37.190.
State archeologist and duties. [Repealed, § 10 ch 112 SLA 1974.]